Utah statutes.
10-3-608.   Rules of conduct for the public.

The governing body on a two-thirds vote may expel any person who is disorderly during the meeting of the governing body.  This section or any action taken by the governing body pursuant hereto does not preclude prosecution under any other provision of law.

